Utah statutes.
10-3-919.   Powers, duties, and obligations of police chief, marshal, and their assistants in a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or town.

The chief of police, marshals, and their assistants in a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or town shall have all of the powers, rights, and duties respectively conferred on such officers in Sections 10-3-913 through 10-3-915.

